Nebraska, session 109, LB1198.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1198 LB1198
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Large public event means an event held at any indoor or outdoor
facility that can accommodate at least five thousand people; and
(b) Paper ticket means a physical document used for the purpose of
granting admission to an event.
(2) Any public or private entity selling electronic tickets to a
large public event shall provide a paper ticket, free of charge, to any
ticket purchaser upon request. The paper ticket shall be delivered to the
purchaser prior to the event or made available for printing by the
purchaser prior to the event.
(3) The Attorney General shall enforce this section. Any public or
private entity that violates this section shall be subject to a civil
penalty in an amount equal to ten dollars multiplied by the total number
of tickets sold at the event at which the violation occurred. All civil
penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
-2-